Washington statutes.
RCW 11.44.050

Inventory and appraisement—Failure to return or provide copy—Revocation of letters.

If any personal representative shall neglect or refuse to make the inventory and appraisement within the period prescribed, or within such further time as the court may allow, or to provide a copy as provided under RCW 11.44.015, 11.44.025, or 11.44.035, the court may revoke the letters testamentary or of administration; and the personal representative shall be liable on his or her bond to any party interested for the injury sustained by the estate through his or her neglect.

[ 1997 c 252 s 44; 1965 c 145 s 11.44.050. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 99; RRS s 1469; prior: Code 1881 s 1457; 1873 p 281 s 138; 1854 p 278 s 69.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.